Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.120

Administrative hearing—Contract to conduct authorized—Final decision.

Whenever a statute or rule provides for a formal administrative hearing before the superintendent of public instruction under chapter 34.05 RCW, the superintendent of public instruction may contract with the office of administrative hearings to conduct the hearing under chapter 34.12 RCW and may delegate to a designee of the superintendent of public instruction the authority to render the final decision.

[ 1985 c 225 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.03.500.]